test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-iv_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - tsiy : # hello, antti
    1Sg+Impf+V+tsiy: ʔistsiy
    2Sg+Impf+V+tsiy: nitsiy
    3Sg+Impf+V+tsiy: ʔitsiy
    1Pl+Impf+V+tsiy: [ʔisiìtsiy, ʔisaàtsiy]
    2Pl+Impf+V+tsiy: ʔastsiy
    3Pl+Impf+V+tsiy: gitsiy
    4Sg+Impf+V+tsiy: ts'itsiy

    1Sg+Prf+V+tsiy: yistsày
    2Sg+Prf+V+tsiy: yítsày
    3Sg+Prf+V+tsiy: yítsày
    1Pl+Prf+V+tsiy: [yaàtsày, yiìtsày]
    2Pl+Prf+V+tsiy: yastsày
    3Pl+Prf+V+tsiy: giyítsày
    4Sg+Prf+V+tsiy: ts'iyítsày

    Distr+1Pl+Impf+V+tsiy: [dàsiìtsiy, dàsaàtsiy]
    Distr+2Pl+Impf+V+tsiy: dàastsiy
    Distr+3Pl+Impf+V+tsiy: dàgitsiy
    Distr+4Sg+Impf+V+tsiy: dàts'itsiy
    Distr+1Pl+Prf+V+tsiy: [dàyaàtsày, dàyiìtsày]
    Distr+2Pl+Prf+V+tsiy: dàyastsày
    Distr+3Pl+Prf+V+tsiy: dàgiyítsày

  Verb - dús : # "crawl"
    1Sg+Impf+V+dús: disdús
    2Sg+Impf+V+dús: dídús
    3Sg+Impf+V+dús: didús
    1Pl+Impf+V+dús: [daàdús, diìdús]
    2Pl+Impf+V+dús: dasdús
    3Pl+Impf+V+dús: gididús
    4Sg+Impf+V+dús: ts'ididús
